Utah statutes.
4-9-2.   Authority to promulgate rules.

The department is authorized, subject to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to make and enforce such rules as in its judgment are necessary to administer and enforce this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

